pt-PT: Tipo de organizador: Banco de trás; Consola; Porta-copos; Porta-luvas; Visor; Outro
ru: Тип органайзера: Заднее сиденье; Консоль; Подстаканник; Бардачок; Козырек; Другое
es: Tipo de organizador: Asiento trasero; Consola; Portavasos; Guantera; Visera; Otros
it: Tipo di organizzatore: Sedile posteriore; Console; Portabicchieri; Vano portaoggetti; Parasole; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de organizador: Banco de trás; Console; Suporte de copo; Porta-luvas; Viseira; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta organizatora: Stražnje sjedalo; Konzola; Držač za čaše; Pretinac za rukavice; Vizir; Ostalo
fi: Järjestäjätyyppi: Takaistuin; Konsoli; Mukinpidike; Hansikaslokero; Visiiri; Muu
nl: Organizertype: Achterbank; Console; Bekerhouder; Handschoenenkastje; Zonneklep; Andere
da: Arrangørtype: Bagsæde; Konsol; Kopholder; Handskerum; Visir; Andet
zh-CN: 整理盒类型: 后座; 游戏机; 杯架; 手套箱; 遮阳板; 其他
ro-RO: Tip organizator: Bancheta din spate; Consolă; Suport pentru pahare; Torpedo; Vizor; Altele
lt-LT: Daiktų dėtuvės tipas: Galinė sėdynė; Centrinis pultas; Puodelio laikiklis; Daiktinė; Akių skydelis; Kita
zh-TW: 置物收納架類型: 後座; 控制台; 杯架; 手套箱; 遮陽板; 其他
bg-BG: Тип органайзер: Задна седалка; Конзола; Държач за чаша; Кутия за ръкавици; Козирка; Други
tr: Düzenleyici Türü: Arka koltuk; Konsol; Bardak tutucu; Torpido; Vizör; Diğer
vi: Loại bộ cáp sạc: Ghế sau; Console; Giá để cốc; Hộp đựng găng tay; Tấm che nắng; Khác
fr: Type d’organisateur: Banquette arrière; Console; Porte-gobelets; Boîte à gants; Visière; Autre
ja: オーガナイザーの種類: バックシート; コンソール; カップホルダー; グローブボックス; バイザー; その他
en: Organizer type: Backseat; Console; Cup holder; Glove box; Visor; Other
th: ประเภทออแกไนเซอร์: เบาะหลัง; คอนโซล; ที่วางแก้ว; ช่องเก็บของหน้ารถ; ที่บังแดด; อื่นๆ
de: Verstauungsmöglichkeit: Rücksitz; Konsole; Getränkehalter; Handschuhfach; Sonnenblende; Sonstiges
pl: Typ organizatora: Tylne siedzenie; Konsola; Uchwyt na kubek; Komora rękawicowa; osłona; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta organizatorja: Zadnji sedež; Konzola; Držala za skodelice; Predal za rokavice; Vizir; Drugo
el: Τύπος αντικειμένου οργάνωσης: Πίσω κάθισμα; Κονσόλα; Ποτηροθήκη; Ντουλαπάκι αυτοκινήτου; Γείσο; Άλλο
hu: Rendszerező típusa: Hátsó ülés; Konzol; Pohártartó; Kesztyűtartó; Napellenző; Egyéb
sv: Typ av arrangör: Baksäte; Konsol; Mugghållare; Handskfack; Visir; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ organizéra: Zadné sedadlo; Konzola; Držiak pohára; Schránka spolujazdca; Priezor; Iné
nb: Organisatortype: Baksete; Konsoll; Koppholder; Hanskerom; Visor; Annet
cs: Typ odkládací přihrádky: Zadní sedadlo; Konzola; Držák nápojů; Schránka na rukavice; Stínítko; Jiné
ko: 정리함 유형: 뒷좌석; 콘솔; 컵 홀더; 글러브 박스; 챙; 기타